test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-luukk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - luukk e-stem sipuli: # Noun - full paradigm
     luukk+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: luukk
     luukk+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: luukk
     luukk+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: luukk
     luukk+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: luuʹǩǩe
     luukk+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: luukkâst
     luukk+N+Sg+Com+Indef: luukkin
     luukk+N+Ess+Indef: luukkân
     luukk+N+Par+Indef: luukkâd
     luukk+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [luukktaa, luukktää]
     luukk+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: luukk
     luukk+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: luukki
     luukk+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: luukkid
     luukk+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: luukkid
     luukk+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: luukkin
     luukk+N+Pl+Com+Indef: luukkivuiʹm
     luukk+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [luukkitaa, luukkitää]
